lexica/noun_rules.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +Common +Proper +Masc +Fem +Neut +Nom +Gen +Dat +Acc +Loc +Ins +Sing +Dual +Plural +Ending +Animate +Inanimate

LEXICON NMascAn

+N+Masc+Sing+Acc+Animate:+Masc^a #;
NMasc ;

LEXICON NMascIn

+N+Masc+Sing+Acc+Inanimate:^ #;
NMasc ;

LEXICON NMasc

+N+Masc+Sing+Nom:^ #;
+N+Masc+Sing+Gen:+Masc^a #;
+N+Masc+Sing+Dat:+Masc^u #;
!+N+Masc+Sing+Acc:^ #; ! This is handled by NMascAn and NMascIn
+N+Masc+Sing+Loc:+Masc^u #;
+N+Masc+Sing+Ins:+Masc^om #;
+N+Masc+Dual+Nom:+Masc^a #;
+N+Masc+Dual+Gen:+Masc^ov #;
+N+Masc+Dual+Dat:+Masc^oma #;
+N+Masc+Dual+Acc:+Masc^a #;
+N+Masc+Dual+Loc:+Masc^ih #;
+N+Masc+Dual+Ins:+Masc^oma #;
+N+Masc+Plural+Nom:+Masc^i #;
+N+Masc+Plural+Gen:+Masc^ov #;
+N+Masc+Plural+Dat:+Masc^om #;
+N+Masc+Plural+Acc:+Masc^e #;
+N+Masc+Plural+Loc:+Masc^ih #;
+N+Masc+Plural+Ins:+Masc^i #;

LEXICON NFemA

+N+Fem+Sing+Nom:+Fem^a #;
+N+Fem+Sing+Gen:+Fem^e #;
+N+Fem+Sing+Dat:+Fem^i #;
+N+Fem+Sing+Acc:+Fem^o #;
+N+Fem+Sing+Loc:+Fem^i #;
+N+Fem+Sing+Ins:+Fem^o #;
+N+Fem+Dual+Nom:+Fem^i #;
+N+Fem+Dual+Gen:+Fem^ #;
+N+Fem+Dual+Dat:+Fem^ama #;
+N+Fem+Dual+Acc:+Fem^i #;
+N+Fem+Dual+Loc:+Fem^ah #;
+N+Fem+Dual+Ins:+Fem^ama #;
+N+Fem+Plural+Nom:+Fem^e #;
+N+Fem+Plural+Gen:+Fem^ #;
+N+Fem+Plural+Dat:+Fem^am #;
+N+Fem+Plural+Acc:+Fem^e #;
+N+Fem+Plural+Loc:+Fem^ah #;
+N+Fem+Plural+Ins:+Fem^ami #;

LEXICON NFemEv

+N+Fem+Sing+Nom:+Fem^ev #;
+N+Fem+Sing+Gen:+Fem^ve #;
+N+Fem+Sing+Dat:+Fem^vi #;
+N+Fem+Sing+Acc:+Fem^ev #;
+N+Fem+Sing+Loc:+Fem^vi #;
+N+Fem+Sing+Ins:+Fem^vijo #;
+N+Fem+Dual+Nom:+Fem^vi #;
+N+Fem+Dual+Gen:+Fem^ev #;
+N+Fem+Dual+Dat:+Fem^vama #;
+N+Fem+Dual+Acc:+Fem^vi #;
+N+Fem+Dual+Loc:+Fem^vah #;
+N+Fem+Dual+Ins:+Fem^vama #;
+N+Fem+Plural+Nom:+Fem^ve #;
+N+Fem+Plural+Gen:+Fem^ev #;
+N+Fem+Plural+Dat:+Fem^vam #;
+N+Fem+Plural+Acc:+Fem^ve #;
+N+Fem+Plural+Loc:+Fem^vah #;
+N+Fem+Plural+Ins:+Fem^vami #;

LEXICON NFemOst

+N+Fem+Sing+Nom:^ #;
+N+Fem+Sing+Gen:^i #;
+N+Fem+Sing+Dat:^i #;
+N+Fem+Sing+Acc:^ #;
+N+Fem+Sing+Loc:^i #;
+N+Fem+Sing+Ins:^jo #;
+N+Fem+Dual+Nom:^i #;
+N+Fem+Dual+Gen:^i #;
+N+Fem+Dual+Dat:^ma #;
+N+Fem+Dual+Acc:^i #;
+N+Fem+Dual+Loc:^ih #;
+N+Fem+Dual+Ins:^ma #;
+N+Fem+Plural+Nom:^i #;
+N+Fem+Plural+Gen:^i #;
+N+Fem+Plural+Dat:^im #;
+N+Fem+Plural+Acc:^i #;
+N+Fem+Plural+Loc:^ih #;
+N+Fem+Plural+Ins:^mi #;

LEXICON NNeutO

+N+Neut+Sing+Nom:+Neut^o #;
+N+Neut+Sing+Gen:+Neut^a #;
+N+Neut+Sing+Dat:+Neut^u #;
+N+Neut+Sing+Acc:+Neut^o #;
+N+Neut+Sing+Loc:+Neut^u #;
+N+Neut+Sing+Ins:+Neut^om #;
+N+Neut+Dual+Nom:+Neut^i #;
+N+Neut+Dual+Gen:+Neut^ #;
+N+Neut+Dual+Dat:+Neut^oma #;
+N+Neut+Dual+Acc:+Neut^i #;
+N+Neut+Dual+Loc:+Neut^ih #;
+N+Neut+Dual+Ins:+Neut^oma #;
+N+Neut+Plural+Nom:+Neut^a #;
+N+Neut+Plural+Gen:+Neut^ #;
+N+Neut+Plural+Dat:+Neut^om #;
+N+Neut+Plural+Acc:+Neut^a #;
+N+Neut+Plural+Loc:+Neut^ih #;
+N+Neut+Plural+Ins:+Neut^i #;

LEXICON NNeutE

+N+Neut+Sing+Nom:+Neut^e #;
+N+Neut+Sing+Gen:+Neut^a #;
+N+Neut+Sing+Dat:+Neut^u #;
+N+Neut+Sing+Acc:+Neut^e #;
+N+Neut+Sing+Loc:+Neut^u #;
+N+Neut+Sing+Ins:+Neut^em #;
+N+Neut+Dual+Nom:+Neut^i #;
+N+Neut+Dual+Gen:+Neut^ #;
+N+Neut+Dual+Dat:+Neut^ema #;
+N+Neut+Dual+Acc:+Neut^i #;
+N+Neut+Dual+Loc:+Neut^ih #;
+N+Neut+Dual+Ins:+Neut^ema #;
+N+Neut+Plural+Nom:+Neut^a #;
+N+Neut+Plural+Gen:+Neut^ #;
+N+Neut+Plural+Dat:+Neut^em #;
+N+Neut+Plural+Acc:+Neut^a #;
+N+Neut+Plural+Loc:+Neut^ih #;
+N+Neut+Plural+Ins:+Neut^i #;
